Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Article 2. Services, Rates, Charges, etc.
§ 56-236.
Public utilities required to file schedules of rates and charges; rules and regulations; when detariffing of telephone services to be permitted.

Unless the Commission determines otherwise, every public utility shall be required to file with the Commission and to keep open to public inspection schedules showing rates and charges, either for itself, or joint rates and charges between itself and
any other public utility. Every public utility shall file with, and as a part of, such schedules, copies of all rules and regulations that in any manner affect the rates charged or to be charged.

The Commission shall permit, but may not mandate, the detariffing of any or all terms, conditions, or rates for (i) any retail telephone service classified by the Commission to be competitive and (ii) any other retail telephone service not found by the
Commission prior to January 1, 2011, to be a basic local exchange telephone service.

As of July 1, 2013, the Commission shall permit, but may not mandate, the detariffing of any or all terms, conditions, or rates for any or all retail telephone services.

History.
Code 1919, § 4066; 1918, p. 674; 1924, p. 538; 1927, p. 123; 2011, cc. 738, 740.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 738 and 740 are identical, and substituted “A. Unless the Commission determines otherwise” for “Every” at the beginning of subsection A; and added subsections B and C.

Law Review.

For survey of the Virginia law on business associations for the year 1970-1971, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1541 (1971).

§ 56-236.1.
Rates to be charged churches.

No electric utility, subject to regulation by the Commission, shall charge a church for its services by any method other than actual kilowatt hour consumption; nor shall any such electric utility charge a church for its electrical service at a rate in
excess of the applicable residential rate for the area in which it is located. As used in this section, “church” shall be limited to the synagogue or church building in which the sanctuary or principal place of worship is located and
to all educational buildings which are physically attached by enclosed corridors or hallways to the building in which the sanctuary or principal place of worship is located.

Notwithstanding the requirements of the first sentence of this section, the Commission may, after a hearing upon application by an electric utility, set a rate for churches in excess of the applicable residential rate if the utility proves that the cost
of service for churches exceeds the cost of service for those other customers under the residential rate. In setting such a rate, the Commission shall consider the special use characteristics of churches, such as the amount of electricity
utilized during off-peak power periods for the utility. The provisions of this section shall not apply to churches which are served by an electric utility having a time of usage rate approved by the Commission and which have elected
to be on such time of usage rate.

History.
1978, c. 531; 1980, c. 259.

§ 56-236.2.
Suspension of service to sewerage system.

No public utility furnishing heat, light or power to a sewerage system, after receiving notice pursuant to § 56-261 or § 56-265.11:1 from the person operating such system, may suspend service for nonpayment without giving at least ten days’ advance notice
in writing to the Commission and the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality.

History.
2000, c. 183.

§ 56-237.
How changes in rates effected; notice required; changes to be indicated on schedules.

No change shall be made in any schedule required to be filed pursuant to § 56-236, including schedules of joint rates, except after 30 days’ notice to the Commission, in such manner as the Commission may require, and to the public, in such manner as prescribed
in § 56-237.1, and all such changed rates, tolls, charges, rules, and regulations shall be plainly indicated upon existing schedules or by filing new schedules in lieu thereof not less than 30 days prior to the time the same are to
take effect; provided, that the Commission may, in particular cases, authorize or prescribe less time in which changes may be made; and provided further that, in the case of water companies, the notice to the public shall set forth
the proposed rates and charges.

History.
Code 1919, § 4066; 1918, p. 674; 1924, p. 539; 1927, p. 123; 1954, c. 298; 1976, c. 763; 2011, cc. 738, 740.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 738 and 740 are identical, and inserted “required to be” preceding “filed pursuant to” and deleted “the preceding section” thereafter, substituted “§ 56-236” for “(§ 56-236),” and “30” for “thirty” twice.

Law Review.

For article analyzing ratemaking issues under the SCC, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 601 (1973).

For special section on rate-making and public policy in Virginia, see 18 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 73 (1976).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, § 30.

§ 56-237.1.
Notification of intent to seek rate change in schedules required to be filed under § 56-236.

Every public utility, other than a public utility providing water or sewer service, that indicates upon existing required schedules, or upon new schedules required to be filed in lieu thereof, changes in rates, tolls, charges, rules and regulations, shall
cause to have published, once a week for four successive weeks, in one or more newspapers in circulation in its franchise area and approved by the Commission, a notice of its intention to change its rates, tolls, charges, rules
and regulations. Every public utility providing water or sewer service that indicates upon existing required schedules, or upon new schedules required to be filed in lieu thereof, changes in rates, tolls, charges, rules and regulations,
shall cause to have published at least once in one or more newspapers in circulation in its franchise area and approved by the Commission, a notice of its intention to change its rates, tolls, charges, rules and regulations. The
last such publication shall appear no less than 30 days prior to the time any changed rates, tolls, charges, rules and regulations shall take effect. This notice shall be in such form and contain such information as prescribed
by the Commission.

Every public utility that indicates upon existing required schedules, or upon new schedules required to be filed in lieu thereof, changes in rates, tolls, charges, rules, and regulations shall mail to each of its customers who receive periodic statements
of charges by mail or send electronically to each of its customers who receive periodic statements of charges electronically, along with its periodic invoice, bill, or other statement advising the customer of its charges, a notice
of its intention to change its rates, tolls, charges, rules, and regulations. This notice shall be mailed or sent electronically no less than 30 days prior to the time any such changed rate, toll, charge, rule, and regulation shall
take effect. This notice shall be in such form and contain such information as prescribed by the Commission.

Except for public utilities providing water or sewer service, the Commission may dispense with either or both of the requirements contained in subsections A and B if either or both such requirements are not necessary to provide adequate notice to all
of the public utilities’ customers. The Commission may prescribe additional requirements for notification to a public utility’s customers of its intention to change its rates, tolls, charges, rules, and regulations.

History.
1976, c. 763; 2011, cc. 738, 740; 2016, cc. 191, 283.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 738 and 740 are identical, and, in subsection A, inserted “required” following “every public utility which indicates upon existing,” inserted “required to be” thereafter in the first sentence, substituted “30” for “thirty” in
the second sentence; in subsection B, inserted “required” preceding “schedules, or upon new schedules” and inserted required to be” thereafter; in subsection C, substituted “subsections” for “paragraphs” preceding “A and B” and deleted
“of this section” thereafter; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 191 and 283 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “other than a public utility providing water or sewer service, that” for “which” and inserted the second sentence; in subsection B, substituted “that” for “which” and
inserted “who receive periodic statements of charges by mail or send electronically to each of its customers who receive periodic statements of charges electronically” in the first sentence and inserted “or sent electronically” in
the second sentence; and in subsection C, inserted “Except for public utilities providing water or sewer service.”

Law Review.

For discussion of this section in the survey of Virginia administrative law for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1360 (1976).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, § 30.

§ 56-237.2.
Public hearings on protests or objections to rate changes.

Whenever pursuant to § 56-237 there shall be filed with the Commission any schedule required to be filed under § 56-236 stating a change of rate, toll or charge and a protest or objection thereto is filed by or on behalf of the lesser of 150 or five percent
of the customers or consumers or other persons subject to such rate, toll or charge, the Commission shall upon reasonable notice conduct a public hearing concerning the lawfulness of the proposed rate, toll or charge. At any such hearing
involving a change of such rate, toll or charge, the burden of proof shall be upon the applicant therefor to demonstrate that the proposed change is just and reasonable. The Commission shall prescribe all necessary rules and regulations
for the conduct of such hearing, which rules shall afford ample opportunity for participation or representation by persons affected by such change.

History.
1977, c. 436; 1995, c. 260; 2011, cc. 738, 740.

The 1995 amendment
substituted “the lesser of 150 or five percent (5%) of the” for “twenty or more” near the middle of the first sentence.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 738 and 740 are identical, and inserted “required to be filed under § 56-236” in the first sentence; inserted “such” preceding “proposed rate, tolls, charge” in the last sentence, and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 56-238.
Suspension of proposed rates, etc.; investigation; effectiveness of rates pending investigation and subject to bond; fixing reasonable rates, etc.

The Commission, either upon complaint or on its own motion, may suspend the enforcement of any or all of the proposed rates, tolls, charges, rules or regulations for schedules required to be filed under § 56-236 of any public utility, except an investor-owned
electric public utility, for a period not exceeding 150 days, or if the public utility is an investor-owned water utility not subject to Chapter 10.2:1 (§ 56-265.13:1 et seq.) for a period not exceeding 180 days, from the date of filing,
and the Commission shall suspend the enforcement of all of the proposed rates, tolls, charges, rules or regulations of an investor-owned electric public utility until the Commission’s final order in the proceeding, during which times
the Commission shall investigate the reasonableness or justice of such proposed rates, tolls, charges, rules and regulations and thereupon fix and order substituted therefor such rates, tolls, charges, rules and regulations as shall
be just and reasonable. The Commission’s final order in such a proceeding involving an investor-owned electric public utility that is filed after January 1, 2010, shall be entered not more than nine months after the date of filing,
at which time the suspension period shall expire, and any revisions in rates or credits so ordered shall take effect not more than 60 days after the date of the order. Notice of the suspension of any such proposed rate, toll, charge,
rule or regulation shall be given by the Commission to the public utility, prior to the expiration of the 30 days’ notice to the Commission and the public heretofore provided for. If the proceeding has not been concluded and an order
made at the expiration of the suspension period, after notice to the Commission by the public utility making the filing, the proposed rates, tolls, charges, rules or regulations shall go into effect. Where increased rates, tolls or
charges are thus made effective, the Commission shall, by order, require the public utility to furnish a bond, to be approved by the Commission, to refund any amounts ordered by the Commission, to keep accurate accounts in detail of
all amounts received by reason of such increase, and upon completion of the hearing and decision, to order such public utility to refund, with interest at a rate set by the Commission, the portion of such increased rates, tolls or
charges by its decision found not justified. The Commission shall prescribe all necessary rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this section on or before September 1, 1980. This section shall not apply to proceedings
conducted pursuant to § 56-245 or 56-249.6.

History.
Code 1919, § 4066; 1918, p. 674; 1924, p. 539; 1927, p. 123; 1980, c. 446; 2010, cc. 1, 2; 2011, cc. 738, 740; 2017, c. 619.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, cc. 1 and 2, cl. 2 provides: “That an incumbent electric utility that was, as of July 1, 1999, not bound by a rate case settlement adopted by the State Corporation Commission that extended in its application beyond January 1, 2002, shall suspend
the collection of interim rates during the pendency of the Commission’s consideration of the utility’s application brought pursuant to subsection A of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia and filed on July 15, 2009. To determine if a
refund is required for the period when interim rates were in effect before such suspension, the Commission shall offset any required refund, which is the amount of revenue collected while the interim rates were in effect that exceeds
the amount approved by the Commission in its final order on the utility’s application, by the amount of revenue that the utility would have collected had the rates ultimately approved by the Commission in its final order on the utility’s
application been in effect during the period between the date such suspension commenced and the effective date of the rates approved by the Commission in its final order. The Commission shall issue its final order on the utility’s
application not later than July 15, 2010, for rates to become effective for bills rendered on and after August 1, 2010, notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A of § 56-235.4 of the Code of Virginia.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 1 and 2, effective February 24, 2010, are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 738 and 740 are identical, and inserted “for schedules required to be filed under § 56-236” in the first sentence; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 619 inserted “or if the public utility is an investor-owned water utility not subject to Chapter 10.2:1 (§ 56-265.13:1 et seq.) for a period not exceeding 180 days” in the first sentence.

Law Review.

For article analyzing rate-making issues under the SCC, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 601 (1973).

§ 56-239.
Appeal from action of Commission.

The public utility whose schedules shall have been so filed or the Commonwealth or other party in interest or party aggrieved may appeal to the Supreme Court from such decision or order as the Commission may finally enter. Upon the granting of such appeal
the Supreme Court may award or refuse a writ of supersedeas, and, if a writ of supersedeas be awarded, it may suspend the operation of the action appealed from in whole or in part. Alternatively, the Supreme Court in its discretion
may authorize putting into effect the schedule of rates so filed and suspended by the Commission or the schedule of rates existing at the time of the filing of the schedule upon which the investigation and hearing have been had, or
require the inauguration of the schedule of rates as ordered by the Commission, until the final disposition of the appeal. But, prior to the final reversal of the order appealed from by the Supreme Court, no action of the Commission
prescribing or affecting rates or charges shall be delayed, or suspended in its operation, by reason of any appeal by the party whose rates or charges are affected, or by reason of any proceeding resulting from such appeal until a
suspending bond payable to the Commonwealth has been executed and filed with the Commission with such conditions, in such penalty, and with such surety thereon as the Commission, subject to review by the Supreme Court, may deem sufficient.
In any appeal from action of the Commission prescribing or affecting the rates or charges of a public utility, such bond, or if no bond is required, the order of the Supreme Court, shall expressly provide for the prompt refunding to
the parties entitled thereto of all charges which may have been collected or received, pending the appeal, in excess of those fixed, or authorized by the final decision on appeal, with interest from the date of the collection thereof.
But no bond shall be required of the Commonwealth. Any bond required under this section shall be enforced in the name of the Commonwealth before the Commission or before any court having jurisdiction, and the process and proceedings
thereon shall be as provided by law upon bonds of like character required to be taken by courts of record of this State.

History.
Code 1919, § 4066; 1918, p. 674; 1924, p. 539; 1927, p. 124; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 31.

Law Review.

For article analyzing the financial barriers to public participation in the regulatory activities of the SCC, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 567 (1973).

For article analyzing ratemaking issues under the SCC, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 601 (1973).

§ 56-240.
Proposed rates, etc., or changes thereof, not suspended effective subject to later change by Commission; refund or credit; appeal; investor-owned public utilities required to show increase complies with § 56-235.2.

Unless the Commission so suspends such schedule of rates, tolls, charges, rules and regulations or changes thereof that are required to be filed under § 56-236, the same shall go into effect as originally filed by any public utility as defined in § 56-232,
upon the date specified in the schedule subject, however, to the power of the Commission, upon investigation thereafter, to fix and order substituted therefor such rate or rates, tolls, charges, rules, or regulations, as shall be just
and reasonable, as provided in §§ 56-235 and 56-247. The Commission may thereupon, in its discretion, order such public utility to refund or give credit promptly to the parties entitled thereto any portion or all of the charges originally
filed by the public utility which may have been collected or received in excess of those charges finally fixed and ordered substituted therefor by the Commission. Rates of any utility found to be operating in violation of § 56-265.3
may be deemed subject to refund by the Commission, on its own motion, as of the date of the Commission’s order finding that the utility was operating in violation of § 56-265.3. Such rates shall then be interim in nature and subject
to refund until such time as the Commission has determined the appropriateness of the rates. Any amount of the rates found excessive by the Commission shall be subject to refund with interest, as may be ordered by the Commission.

From any action of the Commission in prescribing rates, refunds, credits, tolls, charges, rules and regulations or changes thereof that are required to be filed under § 56-236, an appeal may be taken by the corporation whose rates, refunds, credits, tolls,
charges, rules and regulations or changes thereof are affected, or by the Commonwealth, or by any person deeming himself aggrieved by such action.

No such rate increase shall go into effect under the provisions of this section for an investor-owned gas, telephone or electric public utility unless such public utility has filed with its schedule information and data designed to show that any increase
complies with the just and reasonable requirements of § 56-235.2, and unless based thereon the Commission finds a reasonable probability that the increase will be justified upon full investigation and hearing. The Commission is authorized
to promulgate any rules necessary to implement this provision.

History.
Code 1919, § 4066; 1918, p. 675; 1924, p. 540; 1927, pp. 124, 125; 1971 Ex. Sess., c. 31; 1973, c. 262; 1979, c. 249; 1998, c. 63; 2011, cc. 738, 740.

The 1998 amendment,
in the first paragraph, added the third through the last sentences.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 738 and 740 are identical, and inserted “that are required to be filed under § 56-236” in the first sentence of the first and second paragraphs; and made minor stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For article analyzing ratemaking issues under the SCC, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 601 (1973).

For special section on ratemaking and public policy in Virginia, see 18 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 73 (1976).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, §§ 22, 23, 28.

§ 56-241.
Rates of telephone companies.

The power of the Commission over the rates of telephone companies shall be as defined (i) by this chapter or (ii) by § 56-481.1.

History.
Code 1919, § 4066; 1918, p. 676; 1924, p. 540; 1927, p. 125; 1964, c. 195; 1973, c. 262; 1984, c. 721; 2011, cc. 738, 740.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 738 and 740 are identical, and deleted “and § 56-481” preceding “or (ii) by § 56-481.1.”

Law Review.

For article analyzing ratemaking issues under the SCC, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 601 (1973).

For special section on ratemaking and public policy in Virginia, see 18 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 73 (1976).

§ 56-241.1.
Flat and measured telephone rates; certain rates prohibited.

Every telephone company which offers dial tone line or substantially equivalent local service shall offer to its residential and business customers at least one offering of such service consisting of a single dial tone line, including associated usage,
for the purpose of two-way voice communications within a local calling area at a flat rate unless there was no telephone company offering such a class of service at a flat rate in the local calling area on January 1, 1979. No residential
or business customer shall be forced to accept local measured rate service for calling within a local calling area based on the number of calls, length of call, distance or time of day, not in effect on January 1, 1979. Nothing contained
herein shall prohibit the Commission from approving the voluntary tariff of any telephone company based on the number of calls, length of call, distance or time of day.

History.
1979, c. 91; 1985, c. 389; 1996, c. 378.

The 1996 amendment
rewrote this section which formerly read: “The Commission shall not approve any mandatory tariff for local service of any telephone company based on the number of calls, length of call, distance or time of day, not in effect
on January 1, 1979. Nothing contained herein shall prohibit the Commission from approving the voluntary tariff of any telephone company based on the number of calls, length of call, distance or time of day.”

§ 56-241.2.
Approval of rates for resale of telephone service.

Notwithstanding the provisions of § 56-241.1, the Commission may approve a mandatory tariff based only on the number of calls for any telephone company if such tariff is limited to the rates charged for the resale of local business service or for the
providing of coin telephone service by a person other than the telephone company.

History.
1985, c. 389.

§ 56-242.
Temporary reduction of rates.

Whenever the Commission, pending an investigation had upon its own motion, or upon complaint, is of the opinion and so finds after an examination of any report or reports, annual or otherwise, filed with the Commission by any public utility, together
with any other facts or information which the Commission may acquire or receive from an investigation of the books, records, or papers, or from an inspection of the property of such public utility, that the net income of such public
utility, after reasonable deductions for depreciation and other proper and necessary reserves, is in excess of the amount required for a reasonable return upon the value of such public utility’s property, used and useful in rendering
its service to the public, and if the Commission is of the opinion and so finds in such cause that a hearing to determine all of the issues involved in a final determination of rates of service will require more than ninety days of
elapsed time, the Commission may, in case of such emergency, enter a temporary order, after not less than ten days’ notice to such public utility of its contemplated action and affording to it reasonable opportunity to introduce evidence
and to be heard thereon, fixing a temporary schedule of rates, which order shall be forthwith binding upon such public utility. But the Commission’s power to order reductions in rates and charges of any public utility by means of such
a temporary order, is limited to reductions which will absorb not more than the amount found by the Commission to be in excess of the amount of income, as determined by the Commission, necessary to provide a reasonable return on the
value of the property of such public utility as found by the Commission as aforesaid.

History.
1934, p. 365; Michie Code 1942, § 4071a.

§ 56-243.
Duration of such temporary reduction.

No temporary order made under § 56-242 shall remain in force or effect for a longer period than nine months from its effective date, and a further period not to exceed three months in addition if so ordered by the Commission.

History.
1934, p. 366; Michie Code 1942, § 4071a.

§ 56-244.
Increase to make up for losses due to excessive temporary reduction.

If upon a final disposition of the issues involved in a proceeding mentioned in § 56-242, the rates or charges as finally determined by the Commission, or the court having jurisdiction of the subject matter, are in excess of the rates and charges prescribed
in any temporary order issued in such proceeding, then such public utility shall be permitted, over such reasonable time as the Commission shall fix, to amortize and recover, by means of a temporary increase over and above the rates
and charges finally determined, such sum as shall represent the difference between the gross income obtained from the rates and charges prescribed in such temporary reduction order, and the gross income which would have obtained, during
the period such temporary reduction order was in effect, based upon the same volume, from the rates and charges finally determined.

History.
1934, p. 366; Michie Code 1942, § 4071a.

§ 56-245.
Temporary increase in rates.

Whenever the Commission, upon petition of any public utility, is of the opinion and so finds, after an examination of the reports, annual or otherwise, filed with the Commission by such public utility, together with any other facts or information which
the Commission may acquire or receive from an investigation of the books, records or papers, or from an inspection of the property of such public utility, or upon evidence introduced by such public utility, that an emergency exists,
and that the public utility has made a preliminary showing of all the elements of § 56-235.2 sufficient to demonstrate a reasonable probability that the increase will be justified upon full investigation and hearing and is of the opinion
and so finds that a hearing to determine all of the issues involved in the final determination of the rates or service will require more than ninety days of elapsed time, the Commission may, in case of such emergency, enter a temporary
order fixing a temporary schedule of rates, which order shall be forthwith binding upon such utility and its customers; provided, however, that when the Commission orders an increase in the rates or charges of any public utility by
means of such temporary order, it shall require such utility to enter into bond in such amount and with such security as the Commission shall approve, payable to the Commonwealth, and conditioned to insure prompt refund by such public
utility, to those entitled thereto, of all amounts which such public utility shall collect or receive in excess of such rates and charges as may be finally fixed and determined by the Commission; and provided, further, however, that
no such temporary order shall remain in force or effect for a longer period than nine months from its effective date, and a further period not to exceed three months in addition if so ordered by the Commission.

History.
1934, p. 366; Michie Code 1942, § 4071a; 1973, c. 262; 1977, c. 336.

Law Review.

For article analyzing ratemaking issues under the SCC, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 601 (1973).

§ 56-245.1.
Meters to be kept in good working condition; defective meters.

Any person, firm, corporation, county, city, town or association, hereinafter referred to as person, who or which furnishes water, gas or electricity to the premises of another and employs a meter to determine the quantity of water, gas or electricity
furnished to such premises and bases its charges thereon shall keep meter in good working condition.

When any such person is notified in writing that any such meter is broken or not functioning properly he shall promptly investigate the matter and, if the meter is found to be defective, repair or replace the meter within thirty days of such notice. If
the meter is found to be in good working condition, a written report of such determination shall be mailed or delivered to the affected customer within thirty days of such notice. If any defective meter is not repaired or replaced
as provided herein, or if the required report is not made, the affected customer shall not be required to pay for the service furnished through the meter, after the expiration of the thirty-day period until the repair or replacement
is made, or until the required report is made, and his service shall not be terminated for failure to pay under such circumstances.

History.
1972, c. 71.

The number of this section
was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the 1972 act having assigned no number.

§ 56-245.1:1.
Customers to be notified about nuclear emergency evacuation plans.

At least once in every calendar year after July 1, 1980, each electric public utility which owns, operates or maintains a nuclear generating facility in the Commonwealth shall publish in a newspaper having general circulation within a ten-mile radius
of such facility, a statement or notice prepared or approved by the Department of Emergency Management setting forth the evacuation and other protective actions to be taken by persons or concerns located within such ten-mile radius,
in the event of a nuclear radiation emergency resulting from the maintenance, operation or failure of such nuclear facility. After the publication of the first statement or notice required hereby, subsequent statements or notices shall
be published at time intervals not exceeding twelve months. The provisions hereof shall not be effective when federal laws or regulations providing for yearly dissemination of similar information to members of the public located within
a ten-mile radius of any such nuclear generating facility take effect.

History.
1980, c. 734.

The number of this section
was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1980 act having been 56-247.2.

§ 56-245.1:2.
Customers to be notified of renewable power options.

The Commission shall post on its website the names, telephone numbers, and available hyperlinks of suppliers of electric energy licensed to sell retail electric energy pursuant to § 56-587, that (i) expressly state in their applications for licensure,
or for any renewal thereof, that they offer electric energy supplied from renewable energy to retail customers in the Commonwealth as described in subdivision A 5 of § 56-577 and (ii) request in any such applications that they
be identified on the Commission’s website as making such offers. Provided, however, that by posting such information on its website, the Commission shall not be deemed to provide any guarantees or assurances concerning the bona
fides of such offers or that any such offers are in conformance with the laws of the Commonwealth.

At least once each calendar quarter, each investor-owned electric utility in the Commonwealth shall include in or on the customer bills a notice directing them to the Commission website described in subsection A. Each investor-owned electric utility shall
also feature available options for purchasing electric energy from renewable sources offered by the utility prominently on its website.

History.
2008, c. 518; 2016, cc. 248, 259.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 248 and 259 are identical, and added subsection A; inserted “B. Beginning January 1, 2009,” substituted “the Commission website described in subsection A” for “a toll-free telephone number or Internet website that will provide
information on the options to purchase electric energy provided from renewable energy sources from the utility or from any supplier of electric energy licensed to sell retail electric energy within the applicable service territory,
pursuant to subdivision A 5 of § 56-577. The notice shall include instructions for purchasing electric energy from renewable sources from the utility or other licensed supplier of electric energy. The option shall be exercisable, at
the customer’s option, either via the company’s Internet website or toll-free telephone number,” inserted “offered by the utility” and substituted “website” for “Internet site.”